test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-miarr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - miârr e-stem sea/meri: # Noun - full paradigm
     miârr+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: miârr
     miârr+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: miâr
     miârr+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: miâr
     miârr+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: mieʹrre
     miârr+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: miârâst
     miârr+N+Sg+Com+Indef: miârin
     miârr+N+Ess+Indef: miârrân
     miârr+N+Par+Indef: miârrâd
     miârr+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [miârtaa, miârtää]
     miârr+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: miâr
     miârr+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: miâri
     miârr+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: miârid
     miârr+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: miârid
     miârr+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: miârin
     miârr+N+Pl+Com+Indef: miârivuiʹm
     miârr+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [miâritaa, miâritää]
